Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.100

Respectful language.

(1) All agency orders creating new rules, or amending existing rules, shall be formulated in accordance with the requirements of RCW 44.04.280 regarding the use of respectful language.

(2) No agency rule is invalid because it does not comply with this section.

[ 2004 c 175 s 2.]